New Jersey, session 222, A3212.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Any unsolicited communication concerning the proposed school budget sent by a board of education to residents of the school district within 90 days of the date of the annual school election, whether the communication is transmitted by mail, phone, e-mail, text, or in any other manner, shall meet the following requirements: a.     be sent to all the registered voters of the school district; b.    contain no school budget information other than the total budget amount, general fund tax levy amount, and line items of appropriation of the proposed school budget and the current school year budget; c.     in the case of printed materials, be no more than one page and not more than letter size, 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches; and d.    not include the name or photo of any member of the board of education. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.